Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.157

Additional powers—Powers and authorities of banks.

Notwithstanding any restrictions, limitations, and requirements of law, in addition to all powers, express or implied, that a mutual savings bank has under this title, a mutual savings bank has the powers and authorities that a bank has under *Title 30 RCW. As used in this section, "powers and authorities" include without limitation powers and authorities in corporate governance matters.

The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to specific powers or authorities of banks apply to mutual savings banks exercising those powers or authorities permitted under this section but only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and requirements relate to exercising the powers or authorities granted mutual savings banks solely under this section.

[ 2003 c 24 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.